New Jersey, session 222, A1266.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.37:1-17 is amended to read as follows: 37:1-17.  Marriage or civil union license; information provided. On the marriage or civil union license shall be the form for the certificate of marriage or civil union in quadruplicate, to which the licensing officer shall have set forth particularly therein the name, age, parentage, birthplace, residence, Social Security number and domestic status of each party, whether single, widowed, divorced, or a former civil union or domestic partner and the names and county of birth of their parents.  No marriage or civil union license form shall require a person to provide the: (1) number of times the person has been married or entered into a civil union; or (2) name of the most recent spouse or civil union partner.  The Social Security number shall be kept confidential and may only be released for child support enforcement purposes, and shall not be considered a public record pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.).  The person by whom or the religious society, institution, or organization by or before which, the marriage or civil union was solemnized, shall personally or by legally authorized agent subscribe where indicated on the form the date and place of the marriage or civil union.  Each certificate of marriage or civil union shall also contain the signature and residence of at least two witnesses who were present at the marriage or civil union ceremony. (cf: P.L.2006, c.103, s.20) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.